Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children

§ 5901.
Purpose and policy—Article 1.

It is the purpose and policy of the party states to cooperate with each other in the interstate placement of children to the end that:

Each child requiring placement shall receive the maximum opportunity to be placed in a suitable environment and with persons or institutions having appropriate qualifications and facilities to provide a necessary and desirable degree and type of care.

The appropriate authorities in a state where a child is to be placed may have full opportunity to ascertain the circumstances of the proposed placement, thereby promoting full compliance with applicable requirements for the protection of the child.

The proper authorities of the state from which the placement is made may obtain the most complete information on the basis on which to evaluate a projected placement before it is made.

Appropriate jurisdictional arrangements for the care of children will be promoted.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5902.
Definitions—Article II.

As used in this compact:

“Child” means a person who, by reason of minority, is legally subject to parental, guardianship, or similar control.

“Sending agency” means a party state, officer or employee thereof; a subdivision of a party state, or officer, or employee thereof; a court of a party state; a person, corporation, association, charitable agency, or other entity which sends, brings, or causes to be sent or brought any child to another party state.

“Receiving state” means the state to which a child is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought, whether by public authorities or private persons or agencies, and whether for placement with state or local public authorities or for placement with private agencies or persons.

“Placement” means the arrangement for the care of a child in a family free or boarding home or in a child-caring agency or institution but does not include any institution caring for the mentally ill, mentally defective, or epileptic or any institution primarily educational in character, and any hospital or other medical facility.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5903.
Conditions for placement—Article III.

No sending agency shall send, bring, or cause to be sent or brought into any other party state any child for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption unless the sending agency shall comply with each and every requirement set forth in this article and with the applicable laws of the receiving state governing the placement of children therein.

Prior to sending, bringing, or causing any child to be sent or brought into a receiving state for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption, the sending agency shall furnish the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state written notice of the intention to send, bring, or place the child in the receiving state. The notice shall contain:

the name, date, and place of birth of the child;

the identity and address or addresses of the parents or legal guardian;

the name and address of the person, agent or institution to or with which the sending agency proposes to send, bring, or place the child;

a full statement of the reasons for such proposed action and evidence of the authority pursuant to which the placement is proposed to be made.

Any public officer or agency in a receiving state which is in receipt of a notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this article may request of the sending agency, or any other appropriate officer or agency of or in the sending agency’s state, and shall be entitled to receive therefrom such supporting or additional information as it may deem necessary under the circumstances to carry out the purpose and policy of this compact.

The child shall not be sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought into the receiving state until the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state shall notify the sending agency, in writing, to the effect that the proposed placement does not appear to be contrary to the interest of the child.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5904.
Penalty for illegal placement—Article IV.

The sending, bringing, or causing to be sent or brought into any receiving state of a child in violation of the terms of this compact shall constitute a violation of the laws respecting the placement of children of both the state in which the sending agency is located or from which it sends or brings the child of the receiving state.
Such violation may be punished or subjected to penalty in either jurisdiction in accordance with its laws.
In addition to liability for any such punishment or penalty, any such violation shall constitute full and sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of any license, permit, or other legal authorization held by the sending agency which empowers or allows it to place or care for children.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5905.
Retention of jurisdiction—Article V.

The sending agency shall retain jurisdiction over the child sufficient to determine all matters in relation to the custody, supervision, care, treatment, and disposition of the child which it would have had if the child had remained in the sending agency’s state, until the child is adopted, reaches majority, becomes self-supporting, or is discharged with the concurrence of the appropriate authority in the receiving state. Such jurisdiction shall also include the power to effect or cause the return of the child or its transfer to another location and custody pursuant to law. The sending agency shall continue to have financial responsibility for support and maintenance of the child during the period of the placement. Nothing contained herein shall defeat a claim of jurisdiction by a receiving state sufficient to deal with an act of delinquency or crime committed therein.

When the sending agency is a public agency, it may enter into an agreement with an authorized public or private agency in the receiving state providing for the performance of one or more services in respect of such case by the latter as agent for the sending agency.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prevent a private charitable agency authorized to place children in the receiving state from performing services or acting as agent in that state for a private charitable agency of the sending state; nor to prevent the agency in the receiving state from discharging financial responsibility for the support and maintenance of a child who has been placed on behalf of the sending agency without relieving the responsibility set forth in subsection (a) hereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5906.
Institutional care of delinquent children—Article VI.

A child adjudicated delinquent may be placed in an institution in another party jurisdiction pursuant to this compact but no such placement shall be made unless the child is given a court hearing on notice to the parent or guardian with opportunity to be heard, prior to his or her being sent to such other party jurisdiction for institutional care and the court finds that:

equivalent facilities for the child are not available in the sending agency’s jurisdiction; and

institutional care in the other jurisdiction is in the best interest of the child and will not produce undue hardship.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5907.
Compact administrator—Article VII.

The executive head of each jurisdiction party to this compact shall designate an officer who shall be general coordinator of activities under this compact in his or her jurisdiction and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party jurisdictions, shall have power to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5908.
Limitations—Article VIII.

This compact shall not apply to:

the sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state by his or her parent, step-parent, grandparent, adult brother or sister, adult uncle or aunt, or his or her guardian and leaving the child with any such relative or nonagency guardian in the receiving state;

any placement, sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state pursuant to any other interstate compact to which both the state from which the child is sent or brought and the receiving state are party, or to any other agreement between said states which has the force of law.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5909.
Enactment and withdrawal—Article IX.

This compact shall be open to joinder by any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and, with the consent of Congress, the Government of Canada or any province thereof. It shall become effective with respect to any such jurisdiction when such jurisdiction has enacted the same into law. Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until two years after the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the Governor of each other party jurisdiction.
Withdrawal of a party state shall not affect the rights, duties and obligations under this compact of any sending agency therein with respect to a placement made prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5910.
Construction and severability—Article X.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof.
The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstances is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 5, 1972.